Illinois, session 104th, HB2800.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 18A-15, 18A-218.30, 20-2, 20-2.1, 20-2.2, and 20-2.3 6as follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/18A-15)8    Sec. 18A-15. Validating and counting provisional ballots. 9    (a) The county clerk or board of election commissioners 10shall complete the validation and counting of provisional 11ballots within 7 14 calendar days of the day of the election. 12The county clerk or board of election commissioners shall have 137 calendar days from the completion of the validation and 14counting of provisional ballots to conduct its final canvass. 15The State Board of Elections shall complete within 31 calendar 16days of the election or sooner if all the returns are received, 17its final canvass of the vote for all public offices.18    (b) If a county clerk or board of election commissioners 19determines that all of the following apply, then a provisional 20ballot is valid and shall be counted as a vote:21        (1) the provisional voter cast the provisional ballot 22    in the correct precinct based on the address provided by 23    the provisional voter. The provisional voter's affidavit   HB2800- 2 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1    shall serve as a change of address request by that voter 2    for registration purposes for the next ensuing election if 3    it bears an address different from that in the records of 4    the election authority. Votes for federal and statewide 5    offices on a provisional ballot cast in the incorrect 6    precinct that meet the other requirements of this 7    subsection shall be valid and counted in accordance with 8    this Article. As used in this item, "federal office" is 9    defined as provided in Section 20-1 and "statewide office" 10    means the Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, 11    Comptroller, and Treasurer. Votes for General Assembly, 12    countywide, citywide, or township office on a provisional 13    ballot cast in the incorrect precinct but in the correct 14    legislative district, representative district, county, 15    municipality, or township, as the case may be, shall be 16    valid and counted in accordance with this Article. As used 17    in this item, "citywide office" means an office elected by 18    the electors of an entire municipality. As used in this 19    item, "township office" means an office elected by the 20    electors of an entire township;21        (2) the affidavit executed by the provisional voter 22    pursuant to subsection (b)(2) of Section 18A-5 contains, 23    at a minimum, the provisional voter's first and last name, 24    house number and street name, and signature or mark;25        (3) except as permitted by item (5) of subsection (b) 26    of this Section, the provisional voter is a registered   HB2800- 3 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1    voter based on information available to the county clerk 2    or board of election commissioners provided by or obtained 3    from any of the following:4            i. the provisional voter;5            ii. an election judge;6            iii. the statewide voter registration database 7        maintained by the State Board of Elections;8            iv. the records of the county clerk or board of 9        election commissioners' database; or10            v. the records of the Secretary of State; and11        (4) for a provisional ballot cast under item (6) of 12    subsection (a) of Section 18A-5, the voter did not vote by 13    mail ballot in the election at which the provisional 14    ballot was cast; or 15        (5) for a provisional ballot cast under item (7) of 16    subsection (a) of Section 18A-5, the voter provides the 17    election authority with the necessary documentation within 18    7 days of election day. 19    (c) With respect to subsection (b)(3) of this Section, the 20county clerk or board of election commissioners shall 21investigate and record whether or not the specified 22information is available from each of the 5 identified 23sources. If the information is available from one or more of 24the identified sources, then the county clerk or board of 25election commissioners shall seek to obtain the information 26from each of those sources until satisfied, with information   HB2800- 4 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1from at least one of those sources, that the provisional voter 2is registered and entitled to vote. The county clerk or board 3of election commissioners shall use any information it obtains 4as the basis for determining the voter registration status of 5the provisional voter. If a conflict exists among the 6information available to the county clerk or board of election 7commissioners as to the registration status of the provisional 8voter, then the county clerk or board of election 9commissioners shall make a determination based on the totality 10of the circumstances. In a case where the above information 11equally supports or opposes the registration status of the 12voter, the county clerk or board of election commissioners 13shall decide in favor of the provisional voter as being duly 14registered to vote. If the statewide voter registration 15database maintained by the State Board of Elections indicates 16that the provisional voter is registered to vote, but the 17county clerk's or board of election commissioners' voter 18registration database indicates that the provisional voter is 19not registered to vote, then the information found in the 20statewide voter registration database shall control the matter 21and the provisional voter shall be deemed to be registered to 22vote. If the records of the county clerk or board of election 23commissioners indicates that the provisional voter is 24registered to vote, but the statewide voter registration 25database maintained by the State Board of Elections indicates 26that the provisional voter is not registered to vote, then the   HB2800- 5 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1information found in the records of the county clerk or board 2of election commissioners shall control the matter and the 3provisional voter shall be deemed to be registered to vote. If 4the provisional voter's signature on his or her provisional 5ballot request varies from the signature on an otherwise valid 6registration application solely because of the substitution of 7initials for the first or middle name, the election authority 8may not reject the provisional ballot.9    (d) In validating the registration status of a person 10casting a provisional ballot, the county clerk or board of 11election commissioners shall not require a provisional voter 12to complete any form other than the affidavit executed by the 13provisional voter under subsection (b)(2) of Section 18A-5. In 14addition, the county clerk or board of election commissioners 15shall not require all provisional voters or any particular 16class or group of provisional voters to appear personally 17before the county clerk or board of election commissioners or 18as a matter of policy require provisional voters to submit 19additional information to verify or otherwise support the 20information already submitted by the provisional voter. Within 212 calendar days after the election, the election authority 22shall transmit by electronic means pursuant to a process 23established by the State Board of Elections the name, street 24address, e-mail address, and precinct, ward, township, and 25district numbers, as the case may be, of each person casting a 26provisional ballot to the State Board of Elections, which   HB2800- 6 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1shall maintain those names and that information in an 2electronic format on its website, arranged by county and 3accessible to State and local political committees. The 4provisional voter may, within 7 calendar days after the 5election, submit additional information to the county clerk or 6board of election commissioners. This information must be 7received by the county clerk or board of election 8commissioners within the 7-calendar-day period.9    (e) If the county clerk or board of election commissioners 10determines that subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) does not 11apply, then the provisional ballot is not valid and may not be 12counted. The provisional ballot envelope containing the ballot 13cast by the provisional voter may not be opened. The county 14clerk or board of election commissioners shall write on the 15provisional ballot envelope the following: "Provisional ballot 16determined invalid.".17    (f) If the county clerk or board of election commissioners 18determines that a provisional ballot is valid under this 19Section, then the provisional ballot envelope shall be opened. 20The outside of each provisional ballot envelope shall also be 21marked to identify the precinct and the date of the election.22    (g) Provisional ballots determined to be valid shall be 23counted at the election authority's central ballot counting 24location and shall not be counted in precincts. The 25provisional ballots determined to be valid shall be added to 26the vote totals for the precincts from which they were cast in   HB2800- 7 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1the order in which the ballots were opened. The validation and 2counting of provisional ballots shall be subject to the 3provisions of this Code that apply to pollwatchers. If the 4provisional ballots are a ballot of a punch card voting 5system, then the provisional ballot shall be counted in a 6manner consistent with Article 24A. If the provisional ballots 7are a ballot of optical scan or other type of approved 8electronic voting system, then the provisional ballots shall 9be counted in a manner consistent with Article 24B.10    (h) As soon as the ballots have been counted, the election 11judges or election officials shall, in the presence of the 12county clerk or board of election commissioners, place each of 13the following items in a separate envelope or bag: (1) all 14provisional ballots, voted or spoiled; (2) all provisional 15ballot envelopes of provisional ballots voted or spoiled; and 16(3) all executed affidavits of the provisional ballots voted 17or spoiled. All provisional ballot envelopes for provisional 18voters who have been determined not to be registered to vote 19shall remain sealed. The county clerk or board of election 20commissioners shall treat the provisional ballot envelope 21containing the written affidavit as a voter registration 22application for that person for the next election and process 23that application. The election judges or election officials 24shall then securely seal each envelope or bag, initial the 25envelope or bag, and plainly mark on the outside of the 26envelope or bag in ink the precinct in which the provisional   HB2800- 8 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1ballots were cast. The election judges or election officials 2shall then place each sealed envelope or bag into a box, secure 3and seal it in the same manner as described in item (6) of 4subsection (b) of Section 18A-5. Each election judge or 5election official shall take and subscribe an oath before the 6county clerk or board of election commissioners that the 7election judge or election official securely kept the ballots 8and papers in the box, did not permit any person to open the 9box or otherwise touch or tamper with the ballots and papers in 10the box, and has no knowledge of any other person opening the 11box. For purposes of this Section, the term "election 12official" means the county clerk, a member of the board of 13election commissioners, as the case may be, and their 14respective employees.15(Source: P.A. 97-766, eff. 7-6-12; 98-115, eff. 7-29-13; 1698-691, eff. 7-1-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 17    (10 ILCS 5/18A-218.30)18    Sec. 18A-218.30. Counting procedures for provisional 19ballots cast in an incorrect precinct within a different 20election authority's jurisdiction.21    (a) The election authority having possession of the 22provisional ballot shall first notify the election authority 23having jurisdiction over the provisional voter that the voter 24cast a provisional ballot in its jurisdiction and provide 25whatever information is needed for the election authority to   HB2800- 9 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1comply with the notification requirements set forth in 2subsection (d) of Section 18A-15 of this Code. For purpose of 3determining which election authority has jurisdiction over the 4provisional voter, the election authority having possession of 5the provisional ballot shall use the address listed on the 6provisional ballot affidavit that was provided by the voter. 7If that address is different from the address at which the 8voter is registered, the ballot shall be rejected; however, 9the affidavit shall serve as a request to register at that 10address. If a voter cast a provisional ballot in an incorrect 11precinct located in the jurisdiction of an election authority 12other than the election authority having jurisdiction over the 13voter's correct precinct, but where the precinct is located 14within the same county as the 2 election authorities (e.g., a 15voter is registered in the City of Chicago, but casts a 16provisional ballot in suburban Cook County), the election 17authority in whose territory the provisional ballot was cast 18shall, after receipt of the provisional ballot, transmit it, 19along with the provisional voter's affidavit and any other 20documentation provided to the election judges, to the office 21of the election authority having jurisdiction over the voter's 22correct precinct. The ballot shall be sealed in a secure 23envelope or other suitable container and transmitted within 8 24business days after the election at which it was cast. If the 25locations of the election authorities' offices are such that 26it is feasible to hand deliver the ballot, the ballot shall be   HB2800- 10 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1sealed in a secure envelope and transmitted in that manner by 2 2election judges (or election officials), one from each of the 32 leading political parties. If the locations of the 2 4election authorities are such that it is not feasible to hand 5deliver the ballot, the election authority having jurisdiction 6over the incorrect precinct shall cause the ballot to be 7sealed in a secure envelope and transmitted via express mail 8within 8 business days after the election at which the ballot 9was cast, with a delivery date no later than the second 10business day following the mailing date. Upon receipt of the 11ballot by the election authority having jurisdiction over the 12correct precinct, the election authority shall proceed to 13remake, and count the votes on, the provisional ballot in 14accordance with the procedures described in Section 1518A-218.20, including the determination of eligibility to cast 16a provisional ballot. Any information provided to the election 17authority within the 7 day period provided for in Section 1818A-15 of this Code shall be sealed in a secure envelope and 19transmitted to the office of the election authority having 20jurisdiction over the voter's correct precinct, along with the 21provisional ballot of that voter.22    (b) Incorrect precinct is located in a different county 23from the county where the voter is registered, but is located 24in the same municipality or legislative district as the one in 25which the voter is registered:26        (1) The election authority having possession of the   HB2800- 11 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1    provisional ballot shall first notify the election 2    authority having jurisdiction over the provisional voter 3    that the voter cast a provisional ballot in its 4    jurisdiction and provide whatever information is needed 5    for the election authority to comply with the notification 6    requirements set forth in subsection (d) of Section 18A-15 7    of this Code. For purposes of determining which election 8    authority has jurisdiction over the provisional voter, the 9    election authority having possession of the provisional 10    ballot shall use the address listed on the provisional 11    ballot affidavit that was provided by the voter. If that 12    address is different from the address at which the voter 13    is registered, the ballot shall be rejected; however, the 14    affidavit shall serve as a request to register at that 15    address. The election authority shall then cause the 16    ballot, along with the provisional voter's affidavit and 17    any other documentation provided to the election judges, 18    to be transmitted via express mail within 8 business days 19    after the election at which the ballot was cast, with a 20    delivery date no later than the second business day 21    following the mailing date. Upon receipt of the ballot by 22    the election authority having jurisdiction over the 23    correct precinct, that election authority shall proceed to 24    remake and count the votes on the provisional ballot in 25    accordance with the procedures described in Section 26    18A-218.20, including the determination of eligibility to   HB2800- 12 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1    cast a provisional ballot. Any information provided to the 2    election authority within the 7 day period provided for in 3    Section 18A-15 of this Code shall be transmitted to the 4    office of the election authority having jurisdiction over 5    the voter's correct precinct, along with the provisional 6    ballot of that voter.7        (2) If a voter casts a provisional ballot in a 8    precinct outside of the county in which he or she is 9    registered and outside of the municipality, representative 10    district, or legislative district in which he or she is 11    registered (if applicable), the ballot shall not be 12    counted. It shall, however, be transmitted via the U.S. 13    Postal Service to the election authority having 14    jurisdiction over the voter's correct precinct within 7 14 15    days after the election and shall be kept for 2 months, the 16    same length of time as is required for other voted 17    ballots.18    For purposes of determining which election authority has 19jurisdiction over the provisional voter, the election 20authority having possession of the provisional ballot shall 21use the address listed on the provisional ballot affidavit 22that was provided by the voter. If such address is different 23from the address at which the voter is registered, the ballot 24shall be rejected, however the affidavit shall serve as a 25request to register at such address. 26(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.)   HB2800- 13 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1    (10 ILCS 5/20-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2)2    Sec. 20-2. Any member of the United States Service, 3otherwise qualified to vote, who expects in the course of his 4duties to be absent from the county in which he resides on the 5day of holding any election may make application for a vote by 6mail ballot to the election authority having jurisdiction over 7his precinct of residence on the official postcard or on a form 8furnished by the election authority as prescribed by Section 920-3 of this Article not less than 10 days before the election. 10A request pursuant to this Section shall entitle the applicant 11to a vote by mail ballot for every election in one calendar 12year. The original application for ballot shall be kept in the 13office of the election authority for one year as authorization 14to send a ballot to the voter for each election to be held 15within that calendar year. A certified copy of such 16application for ballot shall be sent each election with the 17vote by mail ballot to the election authority's central ballot 18counting location to be used in lieu of the original 19application for ballot. No registration shall be required in 20order to vote pursuant to this Section.21    Ballots under this Section shall be mailed by the election 22authority in the manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of this 23Article and not otherwise. Ballots voted under this Section 24must be returned postmarked no later than election day and 25received for counting at the central ballot counting location   HB2800- 14 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1of the election authority during the period for counting 2provisional ballots, the last day of which is the 7th 14th day 3following election day.4(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 5    (10 ILCS 5/20-2.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2.1)6    Sec. 20-2.1. Citizens of the United States temporarily 7residing outside the territorial limits of the United States 8who are not registered but otherwise qualified to vote and who 9expect to be absent from their county of residence during the 10periods of voter registration provided for in Articles 4, 5 or 116 of this Code and on the day of holding any election, may make 12simultaneous application to the election authority having 13jurisdiction over their precinct of residence for registration 14by mail and vote by mail ballot not less than 30 days before 15the election. Such application may be made on the official 16postcard or on a form furnished by the election authority as 17prescribed by Section 20-3 of this Article or by facsimile or 18electronic transmission. A request pursuant to this Section 19shall entitle the applicant to a vote by mail ballot for every 20election in one calendar year. The original application for 21ballot shall be kept in the office of the election authority 22for one year as authorization to send a ballot to the voter for 23each election to be held within that calendar year. A 24certified copy of such application for ballot shall be sent 25each election with the vote by mail ballot to the election   HB2800- 15 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1authority's central ballot counting location to be used in 2lieu of the original application for ballot.3    Registration shall be required in order to vote pursuant 4to this Section. However, if the election authority receives 5one of such applications after 30 days but not less than 10 6days before a Federal election, said applicant shall be sent a 7ballot containing the Federal offices only and registration 8for that election shall be waived.9    Ballots under this Section shall be delivered by the 10election authority in the manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of 11this Article in person, by mail, or, if requested by the 12applicant and the election authority has the capability, by 13facsimile transmission or by electronic transmission.14    Ballots voted under this Section must be returned 15postmarked no later than election day and received for 16counting at the central ballot counting location of the 17election authority during the period for counting provisional 18ballots, the last day of which is the 7th 14th day following 19election day. 20(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.) 21    (10 ILCS 5/20-2.2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2.2)22    Sec. 20-2.2. Any non-resident civilian citizen, otherwise 23qualified to vote, may make application to the election 24authority having jurisdiction over his precinct of former 25residence for a vote by mail ballot containing the Federal   HB2800- 16 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1offices only not less than 10 days before a Federal election. 2Such application may be made on the official postcard or by 3facsimile or electronic transmission. A request pursuant to 4this Section shall entitle the applicant to a vote by mail 5ballot for every election in one calendar year at which 6Federal offices are filled. The original application for 7ballot shall be kept in the office of the election authority 8for one year as authorization to send a ballot to the voter for 9each election to be held within that calendar year at which 10Federal offices are filled. A certified copy of such 11application for ballot shall be sent each election with the 12vote by mail ballot to the election authority's central ballot 13counting location to be used in lieu of the original 14application for ballot. No registration shall be required in 15order to vote pursuant to this Section. Ballots under this 16Section shall be delivered by the election authority in the 17manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of this Article in person, 18by mail, or, if requested by the applicant and the election 19authority has the capability, by facsimile transmission or by 20electronic transmission. Ballots voted under this Section must 21be returned postmarked no later than election day and received 22for counting at the central ballot counting location of the 23election authority during the period for counting provisional 24ballots, the last day of which is the 7th 14th day following 25election day.26(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.)   HB2800- 17 -LRB104 08174 SPS 18223 b1    (10 ILCS 5/20-2.3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 20-2.3)2    Sec. 20-2.3. Members of the Armed Forces and their spouses 3and dependents. Any member of the United States Armed Forces 4while on active duty, and his or her spouse and dependents, 5otherwise qualified to vote, who expects in the course of his 6or her duties to be absent from the county in which he or she 7resides on the day of holding any election, in addition to any 8other method of making application for vote by mail ballot 9under this Article, may make application for a vote by mail 10ballot to the election authority having jurisdiction over his 11or her precinct of residence by a facsimile machine or 12electronic transmission not less than 10 days before the 13election.14    Ballots under this Section shall be delivered by the 15election authority in the manner prescribed by Section 20-5 of 16this Article in person, by mail, or, if requested by the 17applicant and the election authority has the capability, by 18facsimile transmission or by electronic transmission. Ballots 19voted under this Section must be returned postmarked no later 20than election day and received for counting at the central 21ballot counting location of the election authority during the 22period for counting provisional ballots, the last day of which 23is the 7th 14th day following election day.24(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 99-522, eff. 6-30-16.)